src-fst-morphology-affixes-abbreviations.lexc.md
# Documenting the morphological tags for Meänkieli abbreviations

This file documents [`affixes/abbreviations.lexc`, the file for Meänkieli abbreviation morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/abbreviations.lexc)  

Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not

**LEXICON ab-noun-itrab** 
**LEXICON ab-noun-trab** 
**LEXICON ab-noun-trnumab** 

* **LEXICON ab-noun**

* **LEXICON ab-adj**

* **LEXICON ab-adv**

* **LEXICON ab-num**

### Lexicons without final period

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-noun**  The bulk

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-adj**

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-adv**

* **LEXICON ab-nodot-num**

### Lexicons with final period

* **LEXICON ab-dot-noun**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

* **LEXICON ab-dot-adj**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

* **LEXICON ab-dot-adv**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

* **LEXICON ab-dot-num**  This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.

* **LEXICON ab-dot-cc**

* **LEXICON ab-dot-verb**

* **LEXICON nodot-attrnomaccgen-infl**

* **LEXICON nodot-attr-infl**

* **LEXICON nodot-nomaccgen-infl**

* **LEXICON dot-attrnomaccgen-infl**

* **LEXICON dot-attr**

* **LEXICON dot-nomaccgen-infl**

* **LEXICON DOT** - Adds the dot to dotted abbreviations.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/abbreviations.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/abbreviations.lexc)</small>

---
